Utah statutes.
19-6-304.   Inspections.

(1)  Upon presentation of appropriate credentials and at any reasonable time, any authorized officer, employee, or representative of the department may:

(a)  enter and inspect any property, premises, or place where he has reason to believe there is a hazardous materials or substances release;

(b)  copy any records relating to those hazardous materials or substances to determine compliance with this part and the rules made under authority of this part; and

(c)  inspect and take samples of any suspected hazardous material or substance.

(2)  If the department's representative takes samples of any suspected hazardous material or substance under authority of this section, he shall:

(a)  give a receipt describing the sample taken to the owner, operator, or agent who has control of the suspected hazardous material or substance;

(b)  if requested and if possible, give the owner, operator, or agent a split sample of the suspected hazardous material or substance equal in volume or weight to the portion he retains; and

(c)  if an analysis of any sample is made, upon request, promptly furnish a copy of the results of the analysis to the owner, operator, or agent.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session

